Arkansas, session 2025, HB1609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 18, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-18-108. Enhanced liability — Certain conditions.
A person convicted of an offense under this chapter may be subject to
an enhanced sentence of an additional term of imprisonment not to exceed five
(5) years if the person recruited, enticed, or obtained a trafficked person
from:
(1) A shelter or facility operating as a residential treatment
center that serves runaway youth, foster children, the homeless, or other
persons at risk of being subjected to human trafficking, domestic violence,
or sexual assault;
(2) A correctional facility while the trafficked person was
*TNL215*
03-10-2025 10:28:46 TNL215

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 HB1609
confined in the correctional facility;
(3) An adoptive, foster, or provisional foster home as defined
by § 9-28-402;
(4) A childcare institution as defined by § 9-28-402; or
(5) A detention facility, forestry camp, training school, or
other facility operating primarily for the detention of children who are
determined by a court to be delinquent.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that human trafficking continues to
be a heightened concern for the state; that it is necessary to create
additional mechanisms to further deter human trafficking in the state; and
that this act is immediately necessary to punish criminals who commit human
trafficking against the state's most vulnerable populations. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for
the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Lundstrum











03-10-2025 10:28:46 TNL215